Arkansas, session 2025, HB1851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of
1941, as originally enacted, included an exemption for the sale of food in
public school, high school, and college cafeterias and lunchrooms operated
primarily for teachers and pupils and not operated for profit.
(b) The General Assembly intends for this act to update the exemption
provided for the sale of food in public school, high school, and college
cafeterias and lunchrooms to be consistent with the current prevailing school
food service and management practices, in accordance with the legislative
intent of the exemption as it was originally enacted.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-401(3), concerning sales tax
exemptions provided for various products and services, is amended to read as
*JLL334*
03/19/2025 11:45:01 AM JLL334

HB1851
follows:
(3)(A) Gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of
food, food ingredients, or prepared food in public, common, high school, or
college cafeterias and lunch rooms dining facilities operated primarily for
teachers and pupils, not operated primarily for the public and not operated
for profit.
(B) A public, common, high school, or college cafeteria or
dining facility that contracts for services or management from a third party
that operates for profit is not considered to be operated for profit for
purposes of the exemption provided under subdivision (3)(A) of this section
solely because a for-profit third party provides services or management for
the public, common, high school, or college cafeteria or dining facility;

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.





















03/19/2025 11:45:01 AM JLL334